Washington statutes.
RCW 18.25.080

Health regulations.

Chiropractic practitioners shall observe and be subject to all state and municipal regulations relating to the control of contagious and infectious diseases, sign death certificates and any and all matters pertaining to public health, reporting to the proper health officers the same as other practitioners.

[ 1919 c 5 s 12; RRS s 10107.]